Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1918
Course of study or training; certified
facility; proof of completion.

For purposes of sections 81-1916
and 81-1917, the
secretary shall accept as proof of completion of a course of study or training
a copy of a diploma or certificate attesting to the applicant's completion
of a training course at an approved or certified training facility or institution, including, but not limited
to, those training facilities or institutions which have been certified by
(1) the American Polygraph Association as a course of study and training in
the use of the polygraph instrument or (2) the National Institute for Truth Verification
and the National Association of Computer Voice Stress Analysts as
a course of study and training in the use of voice stress instruments.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB860, § 2.